District of Columbia statutes.
31-3861

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Health benefits plan” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 31-3131(4).

(2)

“Health insurer” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 31-3131(5).

(3)

“Provider” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 31-3131(7).

(4)

“Telehealth” means the delivery of healthcare services through the use of interactive audio, video, or other electronic media used for the purpose of diagnosis, consultation, or treatment; provided, that services delivered through audio-only telephones, electronic mail messages, or facsimile transmissions are not included.

History

Oct. 17, 2013, D.C. Law 20-26, § 2, 60 DCR 11117